District of Columbia statutes.
9-316

Certain grade crossings to be closed after completion of Fern Street Viaduct.

From and after the completion of the viaduct and approaches to carry Fern Street over the tracks and right-of-way of the Metropolitan branch of the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad Company, the highway grade crossing over the tracks and right-of-way of the said Baltimore and Ohio Railroad Company at Chestnut Street shall be forever closed against further traffic of any kind; and from and after the completion of the viaduct and approaches to carry Varnum Street over the tracks and right-of-way of the Metropolitan branch of the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad Company, the highway grade crossing over the tracks and right-of-way of the said railroad company at Bates Road shall be forever closed against further traffic of any kind, and from and after the completion of the viaduct and approaches to carry Eastern Avenue over the tracks and right-of-way of the Philadelphia, Baltimore and Washington Railroad Company and the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad Company, the highway grade crossing over the tracks and rights-of-way of the said railroad companies at Quarles Street, shall be forever closed against further traffic of any kind.

History

Mar. 3, 1927, 44 Stat. 1354, ch. 306, § 4

Cross References

Pennsylvania Railroad Company, switch and siding connections, see § 9-1205.01 et seq.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-1205.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-516.
1973 Ed., § 7-516.